Utah statutes.
39-6-80.   Assault or willful disobedience of subordinate officer.

A warrant officer or enlisted member shall be punished as a military court directs who:

(1)  strikes or assaults a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of his office;

(2)  willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer; or

(3)  treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of his office.

